Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 44.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,360
All-terrain
vehicle; utility-type vehicle; competitive
events; exemptions.

All-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles participating
in competitive events may be exempted from sections 60-6,357 to 60-6,359 at
the discretion of the Director of Motor Vehicles.

Laws 1987, LB 80, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2806;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 456;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 44.